src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON KUNNA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:kunna  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:kann   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:kanst  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:kann   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:kunnu  # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:kunna  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:kundi  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:kundi  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:kundi  # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:kundu  # ;
         +V+Sup:kunnað # ;

LEXICON MEGA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:mega  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:má    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:mást  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:má    # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:mugu  # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:muga  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:mátti # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:mátti # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:mátti # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:máttu # ;

LEXICON MUNNA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:munna  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:man    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:manst  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:man    # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:munnu  # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:munna  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:mundi  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:mundi  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:mundi  # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:mundu  # ;
         +V+Sup:munnað # ;

LEXICON SKULA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:skula  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:skal   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:skalt  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:skal   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:skulu  # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:skula  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:skuldi # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:skuldi # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:skuldi # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:skuldu # ;
         +V+Sup:skulað # ;

LEXICON TYKJA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:tykja   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:tykir   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:tykir   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:tykir   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:tykir   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:tókti   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:tykti   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:tókti   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:tykti   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:tóktist # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:tyktist # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:tókti   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:tykti   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:tóktu   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:tyktu   # ;
         +V+Sup:tykt    # ;

LEXICON VERA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:vera  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:eri   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:ert   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:er    # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:eru   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:var   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:varst # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:var   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:vóru  # ;
         +V+Sup:verið # ;

LEXICON VERÐA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:verða    #   ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:verði    #   ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:verð%>ur #   ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:verð%>ur #   ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:verða    #   ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:varð     #   ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:varðst   #   ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:varð     #   ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:vórðu    #   ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:verð     #   ;
     +V+Sbj+3Sg:verði    #   ; !XXX verði ljós
      +V+Imp+Pl:verðið   #   ;
      +V+PrsPrc:verðandi #   ;
      +V+PrfPrc:vorðin   p26 ;


LEXICON VILJA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:vilja  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:vil    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:vilt   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:vil    # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:vilja  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:vildi  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:vildi  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:vildi  # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:vildu  # ;
         +V+Sup:viljað # ;

LEXICON VITA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:vita   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:veit   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:veitst # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:veit   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:vita   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:visti  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:visti  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:visti  # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:vistu  # ;
         +V+Sup:vitað  # ;


LEXICON SÍGGJA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:síggja    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:síggi     #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:sært      #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:sær       #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:síggja    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:sá        #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:sást      #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:sá        #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:sóu       #  ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:síggj     #  ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:sí        #  ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:síggið    #  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:síggjandi VANDI ;
      +V+PrfPrc:sædd%>ur  #  ;
         +V+Sup:sæð       #  ;
         +V+Sup:sætt      #  ;

LEXICON FÁA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
              +V+Inf:fáa    # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:fái    # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:fært   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:fær    # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:fær    #    ;
       +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:fáa    # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:fekk   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:fekst  # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:fekk   # ;
       +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:fingu  # ;
           +V+Imp+Sg:fá     # ;
           +V+Imp+Pl:fáið   # ;
           +V+PrfPrc:fingin # ;
              +V+Sup:fingið # ;

LEXICON NÁA !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ XXX check
              +V+Inf:náa  # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:nær  # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:nært # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:nær  # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:nær  # ;
       +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:náa  # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:nátt # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:nátt # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:nátt # ;
       +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:nátt # ;
           +V+Imp+Sg:ná   # ;
           +V+Imp+Pl:náið # ;
           +V+PrfPrc:nátt # ;
              +V+Sup:nátt # ;

LEXICON LIGGJA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:iggja    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:iggi     #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:igg%>ur  #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:igg%>ur  #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:iggja    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:á        #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:ást      #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:á        #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:ógu      #  ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:igg      #  ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:iggið    #  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:iggjandi VANDI ;
      +V+PrfPrc:igin     #  ;
         +V+Sup:igið     #  ;


LEXICON RADA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
          +V+Inf:ráða    #   ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:ráði    #   ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:ræður   #   ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:ræður   #   ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:ráða    #   ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:ráddi   #   ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:ráddi   #   ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:ráddi   #   ;
   +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:ráddu   #   ;
       +V+Imp+Sg:ráð     #   ;
       +V+Imp+Pl:ráðið   #   ;
       +V+PrsPrc:ráðandi VANDI  ;
              :rá      sup_tt ;

LEXICON SYNGJA !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ XXX check
         +V+Inf:syngja    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:syngi     #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:syngur    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:syngur    #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:syngja    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:sang      #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:sangst    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:sang      #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:sang      #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:sungu     #  ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:syng      #  ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:syngið    #  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:syngjandi VANDI ;
      +V+PrfPrc:sungið    #  ;
         +V+Sup:sungin    #  ;



LEXICON HOGGA !
!! __@LEXNAME@__ høgga
         +V+Inf:høgga    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:høggi    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:høggur   #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:høggur   #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:høgga    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:høgdi    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:høgdi    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:høgdi    #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:høgdu    #  ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:høgg     #  ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:høggið   #  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:høggandi VANDI ;
      +V+PrfPrc:høgdur   #  ;
         +V+Sup:høgt     #  ;

LEXICON KVODA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:kvøða    	#  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:kvøði    	#  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:kvøður   	#  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:kvøður   	#  ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:kvøða    	#  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:kvað   		#  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:kvað   		#  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:kvaðst   	#  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:kvað     	#  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:kvóðu    	#  ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:kvøð    	#  ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:kvøðið   	#  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:kvøðandi 	VANDI ;
      +V+PrfPrc:kvøðin  	#  ;
         +V+Sup:kvøðið  	#  ;



LEXICON FLYGGJA
!! __@LEXNAME@__
         +V+Inf:flýggja    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:flýggi     #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:flýggjar   #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:flýggjar   #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:flýggja    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:flýddi     #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:flýddi     #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:flýddi     #  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:flýddu     #  ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:flýggja    #  ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:flýggið    #  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:flýggjandi VANDI ;
      +V+PrfPrc:flýddur    #  ;
         +V+Sup:flýtt      #  ;
