src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
mega: MEGA ;
liggja:l LIGGJA ; ! strong verb to lie
síggja: SÍGGJA ;
burtursíggja:burtur# SÍGGJA ;
tykja: TYKJA ;
samtykja+V:sam# TYKJA ;
vilja: VILJA ;
skula: SKULA ;
kunna: KUNNA ;
munna: MUNNA ;
vera: VERA ;
vita: VITA ;
fáa: FÁA ;
náa: NÁA ;
verða: VERÐA ;
ráða: RADA ;
syngja: SYNGJA ;
hálshøgga:háls# HOGGA ;
grovhøgga:grov# HOGGA ;
munnhøgga:munn# HOGGA ;
høgga: HOGGA ;
flýggja: FLYGGJA ;
útflýggja:út# FLYGGJA ;
innflýggja:inn# FLYGGJA ;
atkvøða:at# KVODA ;
brævatkvøða:bræv#at# KVODA ;
kvøða: KVODA ;
skotkvøða:skot#kvøð KVODA ;
